Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-508
Water Funding Task Force; funding;
Department of Natural Resources; duties.

The Department of Natural Resources shall establish a separate
budget subprogram to account for funds appropriated to carry out sections
50-504 to 50-507. No later than February 1, 2014, the department shall notify
the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature and the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature regarding the projected unexpended and uncommitted
balance remaining in the separate budget subprogram.

Laws 2013, LB517, § 5.